Utah statutes.
26-4-24.   Autopsies -- Persons eligible to authorize.
(1)  Autopsies may be authorized:
(a)  by the commissioner of the Labor Commission or the commissioner's
designee as provided in Section 34A-2-603;
(b)  by individuals by will or other written document;
(c)  upon a decedent by the next of kin in the following order and as known:
surviving spouse, child, if 18 years or older, otherwise the legal guardian of
the child, parent, sibling, uncle or aunt, nephew or niece, cousin, others
charged by law with the duty of burial, or friend assuming the obligation of
burial;
(d)  by the county attorney, district attorney, or the district attorney's
deputy, or a district judge; and
(e)  by the medical examiner as provided in this chapter.
(2)  Autopsies authorized under Subsections (1)(a) and (1)(d) shall be
performed by a certified pathologist.
(3)  No criminal or civil action arises against a pathologist or a physician
who proceeds in good faith and performs an autopsy authorized by this section.
